lt-LT: Rotoriaus konfigūracijos tipas: Koaksialinis; Daugiarotoris (kvadrokopterio tipo); Vieno rotoriaus (kolektyvinio žingsnio); Vieno rotoriaus (fiksuoto žingsnio); Kita
th: ประเภทรูปแบบใบพัด: โคแอกเซียล; มัลติโรเตอร์ (สไตล์ควอดคอปเตอร์); โรเตอร์เดี่ยว (Collective pitch); โรเตอร์เดี่ยว (Fixed pitch); อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de configurație a rotorului: Coaxial; Multirotor (tip quadcopter); Rotor simplu (pas colectiv); Rotor simplu (pas fix); Altele
sl-SI: Zgradba vrvi: Koaksialna; Večrotorska (slog kvadrokopterja); Enojni rotor (kolektivni korak); Enojni rotor (fiksni korak); Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de configuração do rotor: Coaxial; Multirrotor (estilo quadricóptero); Rotor único (passo coletivo); Rotor único (passo fixo); Outro
en: Rotor configuration type: Coaxial; Multirotor (quadcopter-style); Single rotor (collective pitch); Single rotor (fixed pitch); Other
fr: Type de configuration du rotor: Coaxial; Multirotor (type quadricoptère); Monorotor (pas collectif); Monorotor (pas fixe); Autre
tr: Rotor konfigürasyon tipi: Koaksiyel; Çoklu rotor (quadcopter stili); Tek rotor (kolektif hatve); Tek rotor (sabit hatve); Diğer
es: Tipo de configuración del rotor: Coaxial; Multirrotor (estilo cuadricóptero); Un solo rotor (paso colectivo); Un solo rotor (paso fijo); Otro
de: Rotorkonfiguration: Koaxial; Multirotor (Quadcopter-Stil); Einzelrotor (Collective Pitch); Einzelrotor (Fixed Pitch); Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta konfiguracije rotora: Koaksijalni; Multirotor (stil kvadrokoptera); Jedan rotor (kolektivni korak); Jedan rotor (fiksni korak); Ostalo
zh-CN: 旋翼配置类型: 同轴; 多旋翼（四旋翼式）; 单旋翼（集合螺距）; 单旋翼（固定螺距）; 其他
bg-BG: Тип конфигурация на ротора: Коаксиален; Мултиротор (тип квадрокоптер); Единичен ротор (колективна стъпка); Единичен ротор (фиксирана стъпка); Друго
sk-SK: Typ konfigurácie rotora: Koaxiálny; Multirotor (štýl kvadrokoptéry); Jeden rotor (kolektívne riadenie listov); Jeden rotor (pevný uhol nábehu listov); Iné
sv: Typ av rotorkonfiguration: Koaxial; Multirotor (quadcopter-modell); Enkelrotor (kollektiv stigning); Enkelrotor (fast stigning); Övrigt
zh-TW: 轉子配置類型: 同軸; 多旋翼 (四軸飛行器風格); 單旋翼 (集體變距); 單旋翼 (固定螺距); 其他
pl: Typ konfiguracji wirnika: Współosiowy; Wielowirnikowy (w stylu quadcoptera); Jednowirnikowy (skok ogólny); Jednowirnikowy (stały skok); Inny
ja: ローター構造タイプ: 同軸; マルチローター (クアッドコプタースタイル); シングルローター (可変ピッチ); シングルローター (固定ピッチ); その他
pt-BR: Rotor, tipo de configuração: Coaxial; Multirrotor (estilo quadricóptero); Rotor único (passo coletivo); Rotor único (passo fixo); Outro
ru: Тип конфигурации ротора: Соосная; Мультиротор (в стиле квадрокоптера); Однороторная (коллективный шаг); Однороторная (фиксированный шаг); Другое
fi: Roottorin konfiguraatiotyyppi: Koaksiaalinen; Moniroottorinen (nelikopterityylinen); Yksi roottori (kollektiivinen nousukulma); Yksi roottori (kiinteä nousukulma); Muu
el: Τύπος διαμόρφωσης ρότορα: Ομοαξονικός; Με πολλαπλούς έλικες (τύπου τετρακόπτερου); Μονού έλικα (συλλογικού βήματος); Μονού έλικα (σταθερού βήματος); Άλλο
it: Tipo di configurazione del rotore: Coassiale; Multirotore (stile quadricottero); Singolo rotore (passo collettivo); Singolo rotore (passo fisso); Altro
da: Rotorkonfigurationstype: Koaksial; Multirotor (quadcopter-stil); Enkeltrotor (kollektiv pitch); Enkeltrotor (fast pitch); Andet
cs: Typ konfigurace rotoru: Koaxiální; Multirotor (styl kvadrokoptéra); Jeden rotor (kolektivní řízení); Jeden rotor (pevný úhel náběhu); Jiné
nb: Konfigurasjonstype for rotor: Koaksial; Multirotor (quadkopter-stil); Enkel rotor (kollektiv pitch); Enkel rotor (fast pitch); Annet
hu: Rotor konfiguráció típusa: Koaxiális; Multirotor (quadcopter stílusú); Szimpla rotor (állítható állásszögű); Szimpla rotor (fix állásszögű); Egyéb
vi: Loại cấu hình roto: Đồng trục; Nhiều cánh quạt (kiểu quadcopter); Cánh quạt đơn (bước cánh tập thể); Cánh quạt đơn (bước cánh cố định); Khác
nl: Type rotorconfiguratie: Coaxiaal; Multirotor (quadcopter-stijl); Enkele rotor (collective pitch); Enkele rotor (fixed pitch); Overige
ko: 로터 구성 유형: 동축; 멀티로터(쿼드콥터 스타일); 단일 로터(콜렉티브 피치); 단일 로터(고정 피치); 기타